Utah statutes.
16-16-1205.   Voluntary dissolution by the board and members.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 16-16-1204, for a limited
cooperative association to voluntarily dissolve:
(a)  a resolution to dissolve shall be approved by a majority vote of the
board of directors unless a greater percentage is required by the organic
rules;
(b)  the board of directors shall call a members meeting to consider the
resolution, to be held not later than 90 days after adoption of the
resolution; and
(c)  the board of directors shall mail or otherwise transmit or deliver to
each member in a record that complies with Section 16-16-508:
(i)  the resolution required by Subsection (1)(a);
(ii)  a recommendation that the members vote in favor of the resolution or, if
the board determines that because of conflict of interest or other special
circumstances it should not make a favorable recommendation, the basis of that
determination; and
(iii)  notice of the members meeting, which shall be given in the same manner
as notice of a special meeting of members.
(2)  Subject to Subsection (3), a resolution to dissolve shall be approved by:
(a)  at least two-thirds of the voting power of members present at a members
meeting called under Subsection (1)(b); and
(b)  if the limited cooperative association has investor members, at least a
majority of the votes cast by patron members, unless the organic rules require
a greater percentage.
(3)  The organic rules may require that the percentage of votes under
Subsection (2)(a) is:
(a)  a different percentage that is not less than a majority of members voting
at the meeting;
(b)  measured against the voting power of all members; or
(c)  a combination of Subsections (3)(a) and (b).
